Utah statutes.
79-3-507.   State paleontological register -- Survey duties.

(1)  The survey shall establish a state paleontological register for the orderly identification and recognition of the state's paleontological resources.

(2)  The board shall notify owners of sites and localities before placing those sites or localities on the State Paleontological Register.

